Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.085

Building code council account—Building permit fee.

(1) There is hereby created the building code council account in the state treasury. Moneys deposited into the account shall be used by the building code council, after appropriation, to perform the purposes of the council.

(2) All moneys collected under subsection (3) of this section shall be deposited into the building code council account. Every four years the state treasurer shall report to the legislature on the balances in the account so that the legislature may adjust the charges imposed under subsection (3) of this section.

(3) There is imposed a fee of six dollars and fifty cents on each residential building permit and a fee of twenty-five dollars for each commercial building permit, issued by a county or a city, plus an additional surcharge of two dollars for each residential unit, but not including the first unit, on each building containing more than one residential unit. Quarterly each county and city shall remit moneys collected under this section to the state treasury; however, no remittance is required until a minimum of fifty dollars has accumulated pursuant to this subsection.

[ 2018 c 207 s 5; 1989 c 256 s 1; 1985 c 360 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 207 ss 1-8: See note following RCW 19.27.070.